Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.657

Lawsuits during period of conservatorship.

Any suit filed against a credit union or its conservator, during the period of conservatorship, must be brought in the superior court of Thurston county. A conservator for a credit union may file suit in any superior court or other court of competent jurisdiction against any person for the purpose of preserving, protecting, or recovering any asset or property of the credit union, including, but not limited to, any claims or causes of action belonging to or asserted by the credit union.

[ 1997 c 397 s 66.]